Tennessee, session 114, HB1037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 20, Chapter 1, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "unauthorized alien" means a person who is
unlawfully present in the United States according to the terms of the federal Immigration
and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. § 1101 et. seq., and must be interpreted consistently with
any applicable federal statutes, rules, or regulations.
(b) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, an unauthorized alien does not
have standing to commence or appear as a plaintiff in a civil action brought under title
29.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1037
001298
- 1 -